Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Cancel or cancellation" means to void.

(2) "Redeem or redemption" means to clear or pay.

[ 2018 c 35 s 2.]